test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-paales_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - pååʹles e-stem poliisi: # Noun - full paradigm
     pååʹles+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: pååʹles
     pååʹles+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: pååʹles
     pååʹles+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: pååʹles
     pååʹles+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: pååʹlsa
     pååʹles+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: pååʹlsest
     pååʹles+N+Sg+Com+Indef: pååʹlsin
     pååʹles+N+Ess+Indef: pååʹlsen
     pååʹles+N+Par+Indef: pååʹlsed
     pååʹles+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [pååʹlestaa, pååʹlestää]
     pååʹles+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: pååʹles
     pååʹles+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: pååʹlsi
     pååʹles+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: pååʹlsid
     pååʹles+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: pååʹlsid
     pååʹles+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: pååʹlsin
     pååʹles+N+Pl+Com+Indef: pååʹlsivuiʹm
     pååʹles+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [pååʹlsitaa, pååʹlsitää]
